Tennessee, session 114, SB1895.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 55, Chapter 10, Part 4, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, if a person is convicted of a
violation of § 55-10-401 involving the use of alcohol or opioids and the court determines
that it is appropriate to order the person to operate only a motor vehicle equipped with a
functioning ignition interlock device under § 55-10-409, then the court may allow the
person to agree to receive naltrexone injections at the person's own expense for a
period of twelve (12) continuous months in lieu of ordering the person to operate only a
motor vehicle equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device.
(b) If a person agrees to receive naltrexone injections for a period of twelve (12)
continuous months in lieu of operating only a motor vehicle equipped with a functioning
ignition interlock device pursuant to subsection (a), then the court must include in the
sentencing order reporting requirements related to the person's receipt of the naltrexone
injections as a condition of the person's probation. A person's failure to receive
naltrexone injections as ordered by the court is a ground for revocation of the person's
probation.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1895
010637
- 1 -